Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 8. Deposits and Depositories
§ 9-4-820.
Deposits by political subdivisions; surety bonds for security; out-of-county banks.

For the security of the funds deposited the proper treasurer shall require all depositories to give surety bonds for the safekeeping and payment of deposits of public monies and the interest thereon, which bonds shall:

Run to the proper county, city, town or school district;

Be approved as to form and substance by the proper governing board and legal counsel; and

Be conditioned:

That the depository shall on the first Monday of January, April, July and October of each year, render to the proper treasurer, and to the proper governing board a statement in duplicate, showing the several daily balances and the amount of public monies held by it during the preceding three (3) months, and the amount of the interest thereon, and how credited; and

For the payment of the deposits, and the interest accrued thereon when demanded by the proper treasurer on his check, order or demand at any time.

The surety bond in form and substance shall be similar, or as near as may be, to the surety bonds required of state depositories and shall conform with W.S. 9-4-804(c).

The bonds shall be issued and placed with the clerk of the county, city, town or school district to which the bond is given.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 19; C.S. 1910, § 2503; C.S. 1920, § 2967; Laws 1925, ch. 65, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 92-121; C.S. 1945, § 20-1024; W.S. 1957, § 9-609; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1124; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See same catchline in notes following §

9-4-814

.

Escrow not within section's purview. —

Escrow is not such a deposit of public money as comes within the purview of this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Depository liable for interest where it accepts deposits aftertermination date. —

Where a local bank has been designated as a town depository, and notifies the mayor that it will not pay interest on the town deposit after a certain date, and tells him to withdraw the account, but continues to accept deposits without objection after that date, it is liable for interest on the daily balance until it discontinues accepting deposits. Lusk State Bank v. Lusk, 48 Wyo. 547, 52 P.2d 413,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1935).

Bond's penalty not changed where exhaustion of remedies againstbank not required. —

A writing attached to a depository bond, reciting the sureties' agreement to pay “all moneys belonging to” the county, without requiring the county to first exhaust its remedies against the bank, does not eliminate or change the penalty of the bond. Board of County Comm'rs v. Mason, 38 Wyo. 1, 264 P. 93,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1928).

Sureties' liability is limited by bond's penalty, not amount authorized to be deposited.

Board of County Comm'rs v. Mason, 38 Wyo. 1, 264 P. 93,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1928).

Sureties' liability for treasurer's violation of provisionlimiting deposits immaterial. —

The liability of the sureties under §

9-4-822

(repealed) on the county treasurer's official bond for the treasurer's violation of subsection (c) of this section is immaterial on the issue of the liability of the sureties on the depository bond, and the liability of the latter sureties is not limited to one-half (1/2) of the penal amount. Board of County Comm'rs v. Mason, 38 Wyo. 1, 264 P. 93,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1928).

Surety not entitled to recover warrants assigned to secureexcess temporary deposits. —

The fact that the surety is liable for the county's entire loss gives it no right to subrogation to recover warrants assigned the county to secure excess temporary deposits under §

9-4-805

.United States Fidelity & Guar. Co. v. Anderson, 38 Wyo. 88, 264 P. 1030,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1928).

Applied

in

Lusk State Bank v. Town Council of Lusk, 48 Wyo. 547, 52 P.2d 413,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 51

, 103 A.L.R. 1256 (1935).

§ 9-4-821.
Deposits by political subdivisions; security in lieu of surety bonds.

Instead of the bonds provided for in W.S.

9-4-820

, the banks or savings and loan associations receiving on deposit public funds may, as security therefor, furnish to the proper treasurer of any county, municipality, community college districts or school district, any of the following:

United States treasury bills, notes or bonds, including stripped principal or interest obligations of such issuances, or any other obligation or security issued by the United States treasury or any other obligation guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States;

Bonds, notes, debentures, or any other obligations or securities issued by or guaranteed by any federal government agency or instrumentality, including but not limited to the following to the extent that they remain federal government agencies or instrumentalities, federal national mortgage association, federal home loan bank, federal farm credit bank, federal home loan mortgage corporation and government national mortgage association. All federal agency securities shall be direct issuances of federal agencies or instrumentalities;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 63, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 124, §§ 1, 2.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 63, § 2.

Conventional first mortgages of Wyoming real estate at a ratio of one and one-half to one (1.5:1) of the value of public funds secured thereby;

through (xviii) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 63, § 2.

Bank qualified municipal bonds of this state or of counties, cities, community college districts or school districts of this state or warrants issued by virtue of the laws of this state, or special improvement bonds issued by incorporated cities and towns of the state of Wyoming, at market value;

through (xxii) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 63, § 2.

Bank qualified municipal bonds of any state, county, city, community college district or school district or special improvement bonds issued by incorporated cities and towns of any state, at market value and bearing a rating of one (1) of the three (3) highest investment grades provided by a nationally recognized rating organization.

The pledged securities shall be subject to the approval of the proper governing board. This act as it applies to securities when pledged by state depositories, shall apply as near as may be to such securities when pledged to the treasurer of any county, municipality, community college districts or school district. The director of the state department of audit shall promulgate rules to govern the pledge of real estate mortgages.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 20; C.S. 1910, § 2504; C.S. 1920, § 2968; R.S. 1931, § 92-122; C.S. 1945, § 20-1025; W.S. 1957, § 9-610; Laws 1971, ch. 2, § 1; 1973, ch. 98, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1125; Laws 1979, ch. 134, § 1; 1981, ch. 14, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 9, § 1; 1987, ch. 219, § 2; 1989, ch. 124, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1994, ch. 45, § 1; 1997, ch. 63, §§ 1, 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; 2017 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1, reinserted paragraph (a)(vi) of this section, which had been inadvertently repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See same catchline in notes following §

9-4-814

.

Escrow not within section's purview. —

Escrow is not such a deposit of public money as comes within the purview of this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Cited

in

United States Fid. & Guar. Co. v. Anderson, 38 Wyo. 88, 264 P. 1030,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1928).

§ 9-4-822.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 63, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 21, related to the procedure when county funds could not be placed in a county bank, and the treasurer's liability for their safekeeping in such event.

§ 9-4-823.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1919, ch. 80, § 1, related to investment of surplus funds.

§ 9-4-824.
Liability of local treasurers for money loss; power to withdraw funds.

No county, city, town, school district, irrigation district or drainage district treasurer is liable on his official bond for money on deposit in any bank under and by direction of the proper legal authority and in conformity with law if the bank has given bond which has been approved as herein provided, except in cases where any loss could have been prevented by the exercise of reasonable care on the part of the treasurer. The proper treasurer may withdraw any or all funds by him deposited in depositories whenever he deems it advisable or to the interests of the public which he represents, or to pay out money as by law required.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 22; C.S. 1910, § 2506; C.S. 1920, § 2970; Laws 1931, ch. 97, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 92-124; C.S. 1945, § 20-1027; W.S. 1957, § 9-613; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1128; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Treasurer not negligent for not interfering with fiscal contractby municipal authorities. —

A contract with a fiscal agent having been made by the mayor and city council, with no demand for security, the treasurer is not negligent in declining to interfere with the contract and demand security. Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

And not liable for loss sustained by fiscal agent. —

A city treasurer, in transmitting money to pay the interest and principal of the city's bonds to an out-of-state fiscal agent selected by the mayor and council, does not violate depository law, and is not liable for any loss sustained by the failure of the fiscal agent. Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

Cited

in

Reed v. People ex rel. Campbell County High Sch., 34 Wyo. 189, 242 P. 319,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1926).

§ 9-4-825.
Joint custody agreement for securing local deposits; banks authorized to receive collateral.

Any properly designated depository of the public funds of the state or any political subdivision thereof, and any treasurer of any proper governing board may agree, as an alternate method of securing the deposit of public funds, to place the collateral security in any financial institution, as defined in W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix) and other than the depository bank, chartered as a state bank or in any national bank other than the depository bank, in any federal reserve bank or branch thereof, in any bank which is a member of the federal reserve system or in any government-sponsored enterprise. The financial institution receiving the collateral security shall be known as the custodian.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 113, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-614; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1129; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence, substituted “as a state bank” for “by the state of Wyoming,” deleted “authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming, or” preceding “in any federal reserve bank,” added “or in any government-sponsored enterprise,” and made related changes.

§ 9-4-826.
Joint custody agreement for securing local deposits; placement of security with custodian; receipt as evidence of deposit.

At the request of the treasurer of the proper governing board, the designated depository shall place the security to be furnished as collateral for the deposit with the custodian agreed upon by the treasurer of the governing board and the depository bank. A joint custody trust receipt is the evidence of the deposit of the collateral security.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 113, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-615; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1130; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-827.
Joint custody agreement for securing local deposits; form for receipts.

The joint custody trust receipt of the federal reserve bank of Kansas City or its branches may be in the form adopted and used by the federal reserve bank.

Joint custody trust receipts issued by other banks shall be:

In a form acceptable to the state treasurer or treasurer of the appropriate political subdivision; or

In substantially the following form:

JOINT CUSTODY RECEIPT
(Name, address of issuer of the Joint Custody Receipt) hereinafter called the custodian, has received to be held in safekeeping subject to the joint order of
(Name of Treasurer and official title) hereinafter called the Treasurer and
(Name of depository bank) hereinafter called the Depository Bank the following described securities: Following and Subsequent Descriptioncoupon attachedPar Value Mo.DayYear Total par value (in writing and figures$)

Click to view

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 113, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-616; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1131; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (b)(i); added the (b)(ii) designation; and made related changes.

§ 9-4-828.
Joint custody agreement for securing local deposits; execution and contents of agreement.

The joint custody agreement shall be executed by the custodian, the depository bank and the treasurer of the proper governing board and shall:

Contain the following provisions:

The custodian will detach as they mature and enter for collection the coupons from the securities and the proceeds when collected will be credited to the account of the depository bank unless otherwise ordered by the treasurer;

The custodian will enter matured principal for collection and hold the proceeds when collected subject to the joint order of the treasurer and depository bank;

It is understood by the treasurer and depository bank that the custodian assumes no responsibility for the nonpayment of interest or principal nor for the validity, genuineness or enforceability of any of the securities deposited in safekeeping hereunder nor makes any representation or warranties expressed or implied, as to the value or worth thereof, nor for the giving of notice of maturity, calls for redemption or the exercise of any rights, priorities, privileges of exchange or conversion or for the timely presentation of maturing principal or interest of any securities deposited under this agreement;

The custodian assumes no responsibility with respect to the safekeeping and condition of deposited property beyond the care and custody it gives its own securities held on its own premises. Any and all forms of protective insurance are to be furnished by the treasurer and depository bank at their option and expense. The custodian is not required to furnish any form of protective insurance; and

The custodian shall deliver the securities to the treasurer upon the sole order of the treasurer when supported by a verified certificate of the state banking commissioner certifying under seal that the depository bank has failed or refused to pay all or a portion of the deposit due the treasurer by the depository bank and that under the terms of the pledge agreement executed by the depository bank the treasurer is entitled to delivery of the securities described in this receipt or the proceeds thereof. Otherwise the securities shall be delivered only upon the written joint order and instructions of the treasurer and depository bank; or

Be in a form and contain provisions as required by the state treasurer or the treasurer of the proper governing board.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 113, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-617; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1132; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “custody agreement” for “custody receipt” and “shall” for “the receipt”; added the present (a)(i) designation; redesignated former (a)(i) through (a)(v) as (a)(i)(A) through (a)(i)(E); added present (a)(ii); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-4-829.
Unauthorized use of monies.

The state treasurer, the treasurer of any county, city, town or school district or any other public officer or employee having in his custody or under his control any public monies, who makes a profit, directly or indirectly, by loaning or depositing the monies contrary to law or who uses public monies for any purpose not authorized by law, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both and may be removed from office.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 23; C.S. 1910, § 2507; C.S. 1920, § 2971; R.S. 1931, § 92-125; C.S. 1945, § 20-1028; W.S. 1957, § 9-618; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1133; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to profit making from public funds, see art. 15, § 8, Wyo. Const.

§ 9-4-830.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to offenses by public officials, see §

6-5-101

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 24, related to bribery of public officers and employees.

§ 9-4-831.
Investment of public funds.

The state treasurer, or treasurer of any political subdivision, municipality or special district of this state, and the various boards of trustees and boards of directors of county hospitals, airports, fairs and other duly constituted county boards and commissions, may invest in:

United States treasury bills, notes or bonds, including stripped principal or interest obligations of such issuances, or any other obligation or security issued by the United States treasury or any other obligation guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States;

Bonds, notes, debentures, or any other obligations or securities issued by or guaranteed by any federal government agency or instrumentality, including but not limited to the following to the extent that they remain federal government agencies or instrumentalities, federal national mortgage association, federal home loan bank, federal farm credit bank, federal home loan mortgage corporation and government national mortgage association. All federal agency securities shall be direct issuances of federal agencies or instrumentalities;

Repurchase agreements involving securities which are authorized investments under paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection. The securities may be held in a custodial arrangement with a member bank of the federal reserve system or in a segregated account at a federal reserve system bank. The repurchase agreement must provide for daily valuation and have a minimum excess market price reserve of one hundred two percent (102%) of the investment;

In accordance with W.S.

9-4-803

with respect to the state and W.S.

9-4-817

with respect to local governments, deposits in financial institutions located within the state of Wyoming which offer federal deposit insurance corporation insurance on deposits in the institutions;

Mortgage backed securities that are obligations of or guaranteed or insured issues of the United States, its agencies, instrumentalities or organizations created by an act of congress excluding those defined as high risk. High risk mortgage backed securities are defined as any security which meets either of the following criteria:

Is rated V-6 or higher by Fitch Investors Service or at an equivalent rating by another nationally recognized rating service; or

Is defined as a high risk mortgage security under Section III of the Supervisory Policy Concerning Selection of Securities Dealers and Unsuitable Investment Practices, as amended by the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council as created under 12 U.S.C. 3301, et seq., or its successor.

In bankers acceptances of United States banks eligible for purchase by the federal reserve system;

In a guaranteed investment contract if issued and guaranteed by a United States commercial bank or a United States insurance company. The credit quality of the issuer and guarantor shall be the highest category of either A. M. Best, Moody’s or Standard and Poor’s rating service. The contract shall provide the governmental entity a nonpenalized right of withdrawal of the investment if the credit quality of the investment is downgraded;

A commingled fund of eligible securities listed in this section if the securities are held through a trust department of a bank authorized to do business in this state or through a trust company authorized to do business in this state with total capital of at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) or which has an unconditional guarantee with respect to those securities from an entity with total capital of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00);

Interest bearing deposits of a savings and loan association or a federal savings bank authorized to do business in this state to the extent that they are fully insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation, or:

Secured by a pledge of assets and the federal savings bank or savings and loan association is otherwise authorized as a depository as prescribed by law; or

The federal savings bank or savings and loan association is otherwise authorized as a depository as prescribed by law and:

In lieu of a pledge of assets securing an interest bearing deposit, a selected savings and loan association or federal savings bank shall arrange for the deposit of the public funds in interest bearing deposits in one (1) or more banks or savings and loan associations or federal savings banks wherever located in the United States, for the account of the public funds depositor;

At the same time the public funds are deposited pursuant to this subparagraph, the selected savings and loan association or federal savings bank shall receive an amount of deposits from customers of other financial institutions equal to the amount of the public funds initially placed by the public funds depositor;

Each interest bearing deposit shall be insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation; and

The selected savings and loan association or federal savings bank shall act as custodian for the public funds depositor with respect to the interest bearing deposits placed in the public funds depositor’s account.

Interest bearing deposits of a bank authorized to do business in this state to the extent that they are fully insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or:

Secured by a pledge of assets and the bank is otherwise authorized as a depository as prescribed by law; or

The bank is otherwise authorized as a depository as prescribed by law and:

In lieu of a pledge of assets securing an interest bearing deposit, a selected bank shall arrange for the deposit of the public funds in interest bearing deposits in one (1) or more banks or savings and loan associations or federal savings banks wherever located in the United States, for the account of the public funds depositor;

At the same time the public funds are deposited pursuant to this subparagraph, the selected bank shall receive an amount of deposits from customers of other financial institutions equal to the amount of the public funds initially placed by the public funds depositor;

Each interest bearing deposit shall be insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation; and

The selected bank shall act as custodian for the public funds depositor with respect to the interest bearing deposits placed in the public funds depositor’s account.

As authorized by W.S.

37-5-605

, bonds of the Wyoming energy authority;

Shares of a money market fund as specified in subsection (g) of this section;

through (xviii) Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 3.

Amended and renumbered as (ix) by Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 2.

Amended and renumbered as (x) by Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 2.

Amended and renumbered as (xi) by Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 2.

through (xxv) Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 3.

Commercial paper of corporations organized and existing under the laws of any state of the United States, provided that at the time of purchase, the commercial paper shall:

Have a maturity of not more than two hundred seventy (270) days; and

Be rated by Moody’s as P-1 or by Standard & Poor’s as A-1+ or equivalent ratings indicating that the commercial paper issued by a corporation is of the highest quality rating.

Investments as provided in W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e). Upon request by any county, municipality, school district, joint powers board or any other local governmental entity the state treasurer may provide an investment fund for local government entities under the same terms and conditions as provided in W.S.

9-1-416

. The fund shall:

Be a second local investment pool with more long-term redemption options than the local investment pool established under W.S.

9-1-416

and with additional penalties for early withdrawal of funds as provided by rule and regulation adopted by the state treasurer;

Be subject to rules and regulations adopted by the state treasurer as provided in W.S. 9-1-416;

Be invested in a manner to obtain the highest return possible consistent with the preservation of the corpus; and

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, be managed in accordance with W.S. 9-1-416.

No investment of public funds under this section shall be made by any of the officials above designated, until the affected fiscal board of the state of Wyoming, the board of county commissioners, the municipal council or the school district board of trustees as the case may be, has first authorized the same.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 63, § 2.

and (f) Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 3.

Investments in shares of a diversified money market fund are authorized except that no entity of Wyoming government shall at any time own more than ten percent (10%) of the fund’s net assets or shares outstanding. Investments under this subsection are limited to a diversified money market fund which seeks to maintain a stable share value of one dollar ($1.00), is registered under the Securities Act of 1933 and Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, and has qualified under state registration requirements, if any, to sell shares in the state and which:

Invests its assets:

Solely in securities or instruments that have a remaining maturity of three hundred ninety-seven (397) days or less at the time of purchase of shares;

Solely in securities issued by the United States treasury, obligations or securities issued by or guaranteed by any federal government agency or instrumentality, and repurchase agreements collateralized by such instruments at not less than the repurchase price including accrued interest;

So that an average dollar weighted maturity of ninety (90) days or less is maintained at all times; and

Under limitations such that the fund may borrow funds for temporary purposes only by entering into repurchase agreements and only to the extent permitted by federal law.

Does not impose a sales charge;

Maintains the highest quality rating from at least one (1) of the nationally recognized rating organizations, such as Standard & Poor’s Corporation or Moody’s Investor Services;

Has an operating history of not less than five (5) consecutive years;

Requires submission of sixty (60) days advance notice of any investment policy change, in the case where such policy changes may be approved without approval of the fund’s shareholders or requires approval by shareholders entitled to vote a majority, as the term is defined under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, of the fund’s shares;

Is purchased from a person licensed to sell securities in Wyoming through or for an account with an entity which, at the time the investment is made by the state or local government:

Has been continuously engaged in the business of selling securities in Wyoming for the preceding two (2) years or a financial institution authorized to do business in Wyoming and qualified by law to act as a depository of public funds in this state; and

Currently, and during the preceding two (2) years, continuously had at least one (1) established place of business in this state. As used in this subparagraph, “established place of business” means a place in this state which is actually occupied either continuously or at regular periods by employees or agents of the entity who are licensed to sell securities in this state and where a large share of the entity’s business in this state is actually conducted.

Every political subdivision shall have on file a “Statement of Investment Policy.” Except for investments by special hospital district boards pursuant to W.S. 35-2-403(d) or county memorial hospitals pursuant to W.S. 18-8-104(d), this policy shall be at least as restrictive with respect to the types of investments authorized as those listed under subsection (a) of this section. The policy shall require that before any person effects any investment transaction on behalf of a political subdivision or offers any investment advice to the governing body of a political subdivision, that person shall sign a statement indicating that he has read the policy and agrees to abide by applicable state law with respect to advice he gives and the transactions he undertakes on behalf of the political subdivision. As used in this subsection, “person” does not include any officer, employee or member of the governing board of the political subdivision for which the investment is made or to which advice is given. As used in this subsection and subsection (j), “political subdivision” means the local government entities listed in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a) of this section. As used in this subsection, “investment” for the purpose of “investment transactions” and “investment advice” does not include deposits in financial institutions as authorized by law. As used in this subsection and paragraph (a)(iv) of this section, “financial institution” means as defined in W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix).

To enhance the background and working knowledge of political subdivision treasurers in governmental accounting, portfolio reporting and compliance, and investments and cash management, the state auditor and the state treasurer shall conduct voluntary education programs for persons elected or appointed for the first time to any office or as an employee of any political subdivision where the duties of that office or position of employment include taking actions related to investment of public funds and shall also hold annual voluntary continuing education programs for persons continuing to hold those offices and positions of employment. The state treasurer and state auditor may contract with other persons with special knowledge in this area to provide the training and may also charge a fee for attendance sufficient to defray the cost of the educational program. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as preventing the state auditor and state treasurer from allowing the general public to attend these education programs upon payment of the appropriate fee.

In connection with, or incidental to, the issuance or carrying of bonds, but only for the purpose of reducing the amount or duration of payment, interest rate, spread or similar risk, or to result in a lower cost of borrowing, and not for purposes of investment, the state treasurer or treasurer of any political subdivision, municipality or special district of this state and the various boards of trustees and boards of directors of county hospitals, airports, fairs and other duly constituted county boards and commissions may enter into contracts which are determined to be necessary or appropriate to hedge risk or to place the obligation of the bonds, in whole or in part, on the interest rate, cash flow or other basis desired, including, but not limited to, contracts commonly known as interest rate swap agreements, interest rate caps or floors, forward payment conversion agreements, futures or hedge contracts.

Any local governmental entity, including the treasurer of any political subdivision, municipality or special district of this state, the various boards of trustees and boards of directors of county hospitals, airports, fairs and other duly constituted county boards and commissions, or their designee, that invests public funds under subsection (a) of this section shall:

Exercise the judgment and care of a prudent investor as specified by the Wyoming Uniform Prudent Investor Act, W.S.

4-10-901

through

4-10-913

;

If the local governmental entity contracts with another person to aid in the investment of public funds, require that the person:

Submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state; and

Act as a fiduciary with respect to the investment of public funds by acting solely in the interest of the public and by acting with the care, skill and caution which a prudent person in a like capacity and familiar with those matters would use in the conduct of an activity of like character and purpose. The contracted person shall incur only costs that are appropriate and reasonable and shall act in accordance with a good faith interpretation of the law governing the investment of public funds.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 99, §§ 2 to 4; 1937, ch. 8, §§ 2, 3; ch. 91, § 1; 1941, ch. 12, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-1102 to 35-1104; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-102 to 13-104; Laws 1959, ch. 25, § 1; 1963, ch. 109, § 1; 1967, ch. 130, § 1; 1971, ch. 269, § 1; 1977, ch. 67, § 2; ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-7-1135 to 9-7-1137; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1988, ch. 75, § 2; 1989, ch. 151, § 1; 1993, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 115, § 1; 1994, ch. 45, § 1; 1995, ch. 173, § 1; 1996, ch. 112, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 2; 1999, ch. 5, § 1; 2004, ch. 84, § 2; 2005, ch. 109, § 1; ch. 172, § 1; 2006, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 38, § 1; 2013 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 34, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to investment of public funds generally, see art. 7 of this chapter.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(xi), inserted “and

37-5-406

” and “and the Wyoming infrastructure authority.”

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 109, § 1, added (k).

Laws 2005, ch. 109, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 172, § 1, inserted the exception at the beginning of the second sentence in (h).

Laws 2005, ch. 172, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 15, § 1, substituted “Wyoming pipeline authority” for “Wyoming natural gas pipeline authority” in (a)(xi).

Laws 2006, ch. 15, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2006.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 38, § 1, in (a), added “which offer federal deposit insurance corporation insurance on deposits in the institutions” in (iv); in (ix), added (A) and (B); inserted “the federal savings bank or savings and loan association is” in (A); in (x), added the (A) designation, added (B), and added the (A) designation, added (B) and inserted “the bank is” in (A); and made related and stylistic changes throughout.

Laws 2006, ch. 38, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(ix) in the introductory paragraph substituted “Interest bearing deposits” for “Certificates of deposit” following “assets securing”; in (a)(ix)(B)(I) substituted “an interest bearing” for “a certificate of,” deleted “simultaneously” following “federal savings bank,” and substituted “interest bearing deposits” for “certificate of deposit” following “public funds in;” in (a)(ix)(B)(II) substituted “pursuant to this subparagraph” for “and the certificate of deposit are issued for the benefit of the public funds depositor” following “funds are deposited,” and substituted “financial institutions” for “banks or savings and loan associations or federal savings banks” following “customers of other;” in (a)(ix)(B)(III) substituted “interest bearing” for “certificate of;” in the introductory paragraph in (a)(x) substituted “Interest bearing deposits” for “Certificates of deposit;” in (a)(x)(B)(I) substituted “an interest bearing deposit” for “a certificate of deposit” following “assets securing,” deleted “simultaneously” following “selected bank,” and substituted “interest bearing” for “certificate of deposit” following “public funds in;” in (a)(x)(B)(II) substituted “pursuant to this subparagraph” with and the certificates of deposit are issued for the benefit of the public funds depositor” following “funds are deposited,” and substituted “financial institutions” for “banks or savings and loan associations or federal savings banks” following “customers of other;” in (a)(x)(B)(III) substituted “interest bearing” for “certificate of;” and in (a)(x)(B)(IV) substituted “interest bearing deposits placed in” for “certificates of deposit issued for” following “respect to the.”

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (a)(xxvii).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (m).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-4-832.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 2, effective July 1, 1993, repealed this section, unless continued by an affirmative act of the legislature, and provides that the repeal shall not affect any loan in existence at the time of the repeal.

This section was not continued by an affirmative act of the legislature, and therefore was repealed effective July 1, 1993.

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 1, related to link deposits and investments and their terms, conditions and limitations.

§ 9-4-833.
Investment of permanent funds [Inactive].

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1992, ch. 38, § 2, provided that the act would become effective on January 1, 1993, if the electors adopted a constitutional amendment prior to December 31, 1992, authorizing the investment of state permanent funds in shares of capital stock under such conditions as the legislature prescribed. The electors did not adopt such an amendment prior to December 31, 1992, and, therefore, this section did not take effect.

§ 9-4-834.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1994, ch. 49, § 1, pertained to investment of permanent funds.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.